Georgia, session 2025_26, SB308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
medical assistance generally, is amended by revising subsection (a) of Code Section
49-4-159, relating to Medicaid coverage for lactation and postpartum care, as follows:
"(a) The department shall provide Medicaid coverage for:
(1) Lactation care and services, as defined in paragraph (5) of Code Section 43-22A-3,
to pregnant and lactating women and to children who are breastfeeding or receiving their
mother's milk; and
(2) Postpartum care for mothers for a period of one year following the date the
pregnancy ends; and
S. B. 308
- 1 -

LC 52 0792
(3) Postpartum mental health care services for mothers, including screenings for
depression and anxiety, and maternal mental health support for a period of one year
following the date the pregnancy ends."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 308
- 2 -